Utah statutes.
62A-11-326.2.   Compliance with order -- Enrollment of dependent child for
insurance.
(1)  An employer or union shall comply with a notice to enroll issued by the
office under Section 62A-11-326.1 by enrolling the dependent child that is the
subject of the notice in the:
(a) accident and health insurance plan in which the parent or legal guardian
is enrolled, if the plan satisfies the prior court or administrative order; or
(b)  least expensive plan, assuming equivalent benefits, offered by the
employer or union that complies with the prior court or administrative order
which provides coverage that is reasonably accessible to the dependent child.
(2)  The employer, union, or insurer may not refuse to enroll a dependent
child pursuant to a notice to enroll because a parent or legal guardian has
not signed an enrollment application.
(3)  Upon enrollment of the dependent child, the employer shall deduct the
appropriate premiums from the parent or legal guardian's wages and remit them
directly to the insurer.
(4)  The insurer shall provide proof of insurance to the office upon request.
(5)  The signature of the custodial parent of the insured dependent is a valid
authorization to the insurer for purposes of processing any insurance
reimbursement claim.
